Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28A.150.260 and 2024 c 262 s 2 and 2024 c 191 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as follows:(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a basic education instructional allocation for each common school district.(2)(a) The distribution formula under this section shall be for allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under subsections (4)(b) and (c), (5)(b) and (c), (8), and (9) of this section, chapter 28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws and regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to use basic education instructional funds to implement a particular instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning period.(b) To promote transparency in state funding allocations, the superintendent of public instruction must report state per-pupil allocations for each school district for the general apportionment, special education, learning assistance, transitional bilingual, highly capable, and career and technical education programs. The superintendent must report this information in a user-friendly format on the main page of the office's website. School districts must include a link to the superintendent's per-pupil allocations report on the main page of the school district's website. In addition, the budget documents published by the legislature for the enacted omnibus operating appropriations act must report statewide average per-pupil allocations for general apportionment and the categorical programs listed in this subsection.(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high, middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section. The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus appropriations act.(b) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are defined as follows:(i) A prototypical high school has 600 average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through 12;(ii) A prototypical middle school has 432 average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight; and(iii) A prototypical elementary school has 400 average annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through six.(4)(a)(i) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one teacher planning period per school day, and based on the following general education average class size of full-time equivalent students per teacher:General educationaverage class sizeGrades K-3. . . . 17.00Grade 4. . . .27.00Grades 5-6. . . .27.00Grades 7-8. . . .28.53Grades 9-12. . . .28.74(ii) The minimum class size allocation for each prototypical high school shall also provide for enhanced funding for class size reduction for two laboratory science classes within grades nine through 12 per full-time equivalent high school student multiplied by a laboratory science course factor of 0.0833, based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual instructional hours in RCW 28A.150.220, and providing at least one teacher planning period per school day:Laboratory scienceaverage class sizeGrades 9-12. . . .19.98(b)(i) Beginning September 1, 2019, funding for average K-3 class sizes in this subsection (4) may be provided only to the extent of, and proportionate to, the school district's demonstrated actual class size in grades K-3, up to the funded class sizes.(ii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules to implement this subsection (4)(b).(c)(i) The minimum allocation for each prototypical middle and high school shall also provide for full-time equivalent classroom teachers based on the following number of full-time equivalent students per teacher in career and technical education:Career and technicaleducation averageclass sizeApproved career and technical education offered atthe middle school and high school level. . . . 23.00Skill center programs meeting the standards establishedby the office of the superintendent of publicinstruction. . . . 19.00(ii) Funding allocated under this subsection (4)(c) is subject to RCW 28A.150.265.(d) In addition, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum specify:(i) A high-poverty average class size in schools where more than 50 percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price meals; and(ii) A specialty average class size for advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses.(5)(a) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition to classroom teachers:Â Elementary SchoolMiddle SchoolHigh SchoolPrincipals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level administrators. . . .1.2531.3531.880Teacher-librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology, and media to support school library media programs. . . .0.6630.5190.523Paraeducators, including any aspect of educational instructional services provided by classified employees. . . .1.0120.7760.728Office support and other noninstructional aides. . . .2.0882.4013.345Custodians. . . .1.6571.9422.965Nurses. . . .0.5850.8880.824Social workers. . . .0.3110.0880.127Psychologists. . . .0.1040.0240.049Counselors. . . .0.9931.7163.039Classified staff providing student and staff safety. . . .0.0790.0920.141Parent involvement coordinators. . . .0.08250.000.00(b)(i) The superintendent may only allocate funding, up to the combined minimum allocations, for nurses, social workers, psychologists, counselors, classified staff providing student and staff safety, and parent involvement coordinators under (a) of this subsection to the extent of and proportionate to a school district's demonstrated actual ratios of: Full-time equivalent physical, social, and emotional support staff to full-time equivalent students.(ii) The superintendent must adopt rules to implement this subsection (5)(b) and the rules must require school districts to prioritize funding allocated as required by (b)(i) of this subsection for physical, social, and emotional support staff who hold a valid educational staff associate certificate appropriate for the staff's role.(iii) For the purposes of this subsection (5)(b), "physical, social, and emotional support staff" include nurses, social workers, psychologists, counselors, classified staff providing student and staff safety, parent involvement coordinators, and other school district employees and contractors who provide physical, social, and emotional support to students as defined by the superintendent.(c) The superintendent shall develop rules that require school districts to use the additional funding provided under (a) of this subsection to support increased staffing, prevent layoffs, or increase salaries for the following staff types in the 2024-25 school year: Paraeducators, office support, and noninstructional aides. The superintendent shall collect data from school districts on how the increased allocations are used.(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per one thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as follows:Staff per 1,000K-12 studentsTechnology. . . .0.628Facilities, maintenance, and grounds. . . .1.813Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics. . . .0.332(b) The minimum allocation of staff units for each school district to support certificated and classified staffing of central administration shall be 5.30 percent of the staff units generated under subsections (4)(a) and (5) of this section and (a) of this subsection.(7) The distribution formula shall include staffing allocations to school districts for career and technical education and skill center administrative and other school-level certificated staff, as specified in the omnibus appropriations act.(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the minimum allocation for each school district shall ((include allocations per annual average full-time equivalent student for the following))be $1,614.28 per full-time equivalent student for materials, supplies, and operating costs ((as provided in the 2023-24 school year, after which the allocations shall))to be adjusted annually for inflation ((as specified in the omnibus appropriations act:Per annual averagefull-time equivalent studentin grades K-12Technology. . . . $178.98Utilities and insurance. . . . $430.26Curriculum and textbooks. . . . $164.48Other supplies . . . . $326.54Library materials. . . .$22.65Instructional professional development for certificated andclassified staff. . . . $28.94Facilities maintenance. . . . $206.22Security and central office administration. . . . $146.37))beginning in the 2026-27 school year. For purposes of this subsection, "inflation" means the implicit price deflator for the previous calendar year as of the beginning of the school year, using the official current base, compiled by the bureau of economic analysis, United States department of commerce.(b) In addition to the amount((s)) provided in (a) of this subsection, ((beginning in the 2023-24 school year, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide the following minimum allocation for each annual average))each school district shall receive a minimum allocation of $214.84 for each full-time equivalent student in grades nine through 12 for ((the following)) materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be adjusted annually for inflation((:Per annual averagefull-time equivalent studentin grades 9-12Technology. . . .$44.05Curriculum and textbooks. . . .$48.06Other supplies . . . . $94.07Library materials. . . .$6.05Instructional professional development for certificated andclassified staff. . . .$8.01))beginning in the 2026-27 school year. For purposes of this subsection, "inflation" means the implicit price deflator for the previous calendar year as of the beginning of the school year, using the official current base, compiled by the bureau of economic analysis, United States department of commerce.(c) The increased allocation amounts of (($21 per annual average))$35.27 per full-time equivalent student ((for materials, supplies, and operating costs)) provided under (a) of this subsection ((is))and $4.69 per full-time equivalent student in grades nine through 12 provided under (b) of this subsection are intended to address growing ((costs in the enumerated categories))materials, supplies, and operating costs and may not be expended for any other purpose.(d)(i) Beginning in the 2026-27 school year, each school district shall annually report all expenditures for materials, supplies, and operating costs including, but not limited to, expenditures in the following disaggregated categories, to the office of the superintendent of public instruction:(A) Technology, including further disaggregation within this category for technology devices, technology support staff, software licensing, and technology or software maintenance and repair;(B) Election fees associated with school district board of directors elections;(C) Utilities;(D) Insurance;(E) Curriculum and textbooks not included under the technology category;(F) Library materials not included under the technology category;(G) Other supplies not included under other categories;(H) Nontechnology-related contracted instructional professional development for certificated and classified staff;(I) Facilities maintenance materials, supplies, and operating costs not funded by transfers from other funds;(J) Security and central office administration;(K) Dues and fees; and(L) Property and equipment not funded by transfers from other funds.(ii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report additional categories as determined necessary to meet other state and federal reporting requirements.(9) In addition to the amounts provided in subsection (8) of this section and subject to RCW 28A.150.265, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide an amount based on full-time equivalent student enrollment in each of the following:(a) Exploratory career and technical education courses for students in grades seven through 12;(b) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students in grades nine through 12 offered in a high school; and(c) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students in grades 11 and 12 offered through a skill center.(10) In addition to the allocations otherwise provided under this section, amounts shall be provided to support the following programs and services:(a)(i) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students who are not meeting academic standards through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the greater of either: The district percentage of students in kindergarten through grade 12 who were eligible for free or reduced-price meals for the school year immediately preceding the district's participation, in whole or part, in the United States department of agriculture's community eligibility provision, or the district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year. The minimum allocation for the program shall, except as provided in (a)(iii) of this subsection, provide for each level of prototypical school resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.3975 hours per week in extra instruction with a class size of 15 learning assistance program students per teacher.(ii) In addition to funding allocated under (a)(i) of this subsection, to provide supplemental instruction and services for students who are not meeting academic standards in qualifying schools. A qualifying school, except as provided in (a)(iv) of this subsection, means a school in which the three-year rolling average of the prior year total annual average enrollment that qualifies for free or reduced-price meals equals or exceeds 50 percent or more of its total annual average enrollment. A school continues to meet the definition of a qualifying school if the school: Participates in the United States department of agriculture's community eligibility provision; and met the definition of a qualifying school in the year immediately preceding their participation. The minimum allocation for this additional high poverty-based allocation must provide for each level of prototypical school resources to provide, on a statewide average, 1.1 hours per week in extra instruction with a class size of 15 learning assistance program students per teacher, under RCW 28A.165.055, school districts must distribute the high poverty-based allocation to the schools that generated the funding allocation.(iii) For the 2024-25 and 2025-26 school years, allocations under (a)(i) of this subsection for school districts providing meals at no charge to students under RCW 28A.235.135 that are not participating, in whole or in part, in the United States department of agriculture's community eligibility provision shall be based on the school district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for free or reduced-price meals in school years 2019-20 through 2022-23 or the prior school year, whichever is greatest.(iv) For the 2024-25 and 2025-26 school years, a school providing meals at no charge to students under RCW 28A.235.135 that is not participating in the department of agriculture's community eligibility provision continues to meet the definition of a qualifying school under (a)(ii) of this subsection if the school met the definition during one year of the 2019-20 through 2022-23 school years, or in the prior school year.(b)(i) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be based on the head count number of students in each school who are eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 4.7780 hours per week in extra instruction for students in grades kindergarten through six and 6.7780 hours per week in extra instruction for students in grades seven through 12, with 15 transitional bilingual instruction program students per teacher. Notwithstanding other provisions of this subsection (10), the actual per-student allocation may be scaled to provide a larger allocation for students needing more intensive intervention and a commensurate reduced allocation for students needing less intensive intervention, as detailed in the omnibus appropriations act.(ii) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students who have exited the transitional bilingual program, allocations shall be based on the head count number of students in each school who have exited the transitional bilingual program within the previous two years based on their performance on the English proficiency assessment and are eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.040(1)(g). The minimum allocation for each prototypical school shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 3.0 hours per week in extra instruction with 15 exited students per teacher.(c) To provide additional allocations to support programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030, allocations shall be based on 5.0 percent of each school district's full-time equivalent basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the programs shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.1590 hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen highly capable program students per teacher.(11) The allocations under subsections (4)(a), (5), (6), and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided under RCW 28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental instructional resources for students with disabilities.(12)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high schools and middle schools under subsections (4) and (10) of this section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (4), (7), and (9) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter 28A.700 RCW.(13)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or rejection by the legislature.(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall remain in effect.(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. Section 1 of this act takes effect September 1, 2025.--- END ---